Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-517
Foreign labor agents or agencies; violation; penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of section 48-515 or 48-516 shall be subject to the penalties set out in section 48-513.

Laws 1965, c. 285, § 6, p. 818.